ja: 肌のアンダートーン: ブラウン/レッド/イエロー; クール; クール/ピンク; ゴールド; ニュートラル; ニュートラル/ウォーム; ニュートラル/ウォーム/ピンク; オリーブ/イエロー; ピンク/イエロー; レッド/イエロー; ローズ; ウォーム; ウォーム/イエロー; イエロー; その他
nb: Hudundertone: Brun/rød/gul; Kald; Kald/rosa; Gull; Nøytral; Nøytral/varm; Nøytral/varm/rosa; Oliven/gul; Rosa/gul; Rød/gul; Rose; Varm; Varm/gul; Gul; Annet
th: อันเดอร์โทนผิว: สีน้ำตาล/สีแดง/สีเหลือง; สีโทนเย็น; สีโทนเย็น/สีชมพู; โกลด์; สีโทนกลาง; สีโทนกลาง/สีโทนอุ่น; สีโทนกลาง/สีโทนอุ่น/สีชมพู; สีโอลีฟ/สีเหลือง; สีชมพู/สีเหลือง; สีแดง/สีเหลือง; กุหลาบ; สีโทนอุ่น; สีโทนอุ่น/สีเหลือง; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Podton kože: Smeđa/crvena/žuta; Hladni; Hladni/ružičasti; Zlatni; Neutralni; Neutralni/topli; Neutralni/topli/ružičasti; Maslinasti/žuti; Ružičasti/žuti; Crveni/žuti; Ružičasti; Topli; Topli/žuti; Žuti; Ostalo
hu: Bőrtónus: Barna/piros/sárga; Hideg; Hideg/rózsaszín; Arany; Semleges; Semleges/meleg; Semleges/meleg/rózsaszín; Olíva/sárga; Rózsaszín/sárga; Piros/sárga; Rózsa; Meleg; Meleg/sárga; Sárga; Egyéb
zh-CN: 皮肤底色: 棕色/红色/黄色; 冷色; 冷色/粉色; 金色; 中性色; 中性色/暖色; 中性色/暖色/粉色; 橄榄色/黄色; 粉色/黄色; 红色/黄色; 玫瑰型; 暖色; 暖色/黄色; 黄色; 其他
bg-BG: Подтон на кожата: Кафяв/червен/жълт; Студен; Студен/розов; Златен; Неутрален; Неутрален/топъл; Неутрален/топъл/розов; Маслина/жълт; Розов/жълт; Червен/жълт; Роза; Топъл; Топъл/жълт; Жълт; Други
ro-RO: Subtonul pielii: Maro/Roșu/Galben; Rece; Rece/roz; Auriu; Neutru; Neutru/cald; Neutru/Cald/Roz; Măslin/Galben; Roz/Galben; Roșu/Galben; Roz; Cald; Cald/Galben; Galben; Altele
pl: Odcień skóry: Brązowy/Czerwony/Żółty; Chłodny; Chłodny/Różowy; Złota; Neutralne; Neutralny/Ciepły; Neutralny/Ciepły/Różowy; Oliwkowy/Żółty; Różowy/Żółty; Czerwony/Żółty; Róża; Ciepło; Ciepły/Żółty; Żółty; Inne
sl-SI: Podton kože: Rjava/rdeča/rumena; Hladen; Hladen/rožnat; Zlat; Nevtralen; Nevtralen/topel; Nevtralen/topel/rožnat; Oliven/rumen; Rožnat/rumen; Rdeč/rumen; Rožnat; Topel; Topel/rumen; Rumen; Drugo
cs: Podtón pleti: Hnědý/červený/žlutý; Studený; Studený/růžový; Zlatá; Neutrální; Neutrální/teplý; Neutrální/teplý/růžový; Olivový/žlutý; Růžový/Žlutý; Červený/žlutý; Růžice; Teplý; Teplý/žlutý; Žlutý; Jiné
en: Skin undertone: Brown/Red/Yellow; Cool; Cool/Pink; Gold; Neutral; Neutral/Warm; Neutral/Warm/Pink; Olive/Yellow; Pink/Yellow; Red/Yellow; Rose; Warm; Warm/Yellow; Yellow; Other
zh-TW: 肌底色調: 棕色/紅色/黃色; 冷色; 冷色/粉紅色; 金色; 中性; 中性/暖色; 中性/暖色/粉紅色; 橄欖色/黃色; 粉紅色/黃色; 棕色/黃色; 玫瑰; 暖色; 暖色/黃色; 黃色; 其他
nl: Huidondertoon: Bruin/Rood/Geel; Koel; Koel/Roze; Gold; Neutraal; Neutraal/Warm; Neutraal/Warm/Roze; Olijf/Geel; Roze/Geel; Rood/Geel; Rozenrood; Warm; Warm/Geel; Geel; Andere
vi: Sắc độ da: Nâu/Đỏ/Vàng; Màu lạnh; Màu lạnh/Hồng; Vàng; Màu trung tính; Màu trung tính/màu nóng; Màu trung tính/màu nóng/hồng; Màu ôliu/vàng; Hồng/vàng; Đỏ/vàng; Hình hoa hồng; Màu nóng; Màu nóng/vàng; Màu vàng; Khác
fr: Sous-ton de la peau: Marron/Rouge/Jaune; Froid; Froid/Rose; Or; Neutre; Neutre/Chaud; Neutre/Chaud/Rose; Olive/Jaune; Rose/Jaune; Rouge/Jaune; Pomme; Chaud; Chaud/Jaune; Jaune; Autre
fi: Ihon pohjasävy: Ruskea/punainen/keltainen; Viileä; Viileä/vaaleanpunainen; Kulta; Neutraali; Neutraali/lämmin; Neutraali/lämmin/vaaleanpunainen; Oliivi/keltainen; Vaaleanpunainen/keltainen; Punainen/keltainen; Ruusu; Lämmin; Lämmin/keltainen; Keltainen; Muu
sk-SK: Podtón pleti: Hnedá/Červená/Žltá; Chladný; Studený/ružový; Zlato; Neutrálny; Neutrálny/teplý; Neutrálna/Teplá/Ružová; Olivová/žltá; Ružová/Žltá; Červená/Žltá; Ružový; Teplý; Teplá/žltá; Žltý; Iné
lt-LT: Odos spalvinis tipas: Ruda / raudona / geltona; Šaltas; Šaltas / rausvas; Auksinė; Neutralus; Neutralus / šiltas; Neutralus / šiltas / rausvas; Olive / geltonas; Rausvas / geltonas; Raudonas / geltonas; Rožinis; Šiltas; Šiltas / geltonas; Geltona; Kita
de: Hautunterton: Braun/Rot/Gelb; Kalt; Kalt/Rosa; Gold; Neutral; Neutral/Warm; Neutral/Warm/Rosa; Oliv/Gelb; Rosa/Gelb; Rot/Gelb; Rose; Warm; Warm/Gelb; Gelb; Sonstiges
ko: 피부 언더톤: 브라운/레드/옐로우; 쿨; 쿨/핑크; 금색; 중성색; 뉴트럴/웜; 뉴트럴/웜/핑크; 올리브/옐로우; 핑크/옐로우; 레드/옐로; 장미; 웜; 웜/옐로우; 옐로우; 기타
sv: Hudunderton: Brun/Röd/Gul; Sval; Sval/Rosa; Gyllene; Neutral; Neutral/Varm; Neutral/Varm/Rosa; Oliv/Gul; Rosa/Gul; Röd/Gul; Rosfärgad; Varm; Varm/Gul; Gul; Övrigt
es: Subtono de piel: Marrón/Rojo/Amarillo; Frío; Frío/Rosa; Dorado; Neutro; Neutro/Cálido; Neutro/Cálido/Rosa; Oliva/Amarillo; Rosa/Amarillo; Rosa/Amarillo; Rosa; Cálido; Cálido/Amarillo; Amarillo; Otros
el: Υποτόνος δέρματος: Καφέ/Κόκκινο/Κίτρινο; Ψυχρό; Δροσερό/Ροζ; Χρυσό; Ουδέτερο; Ουδέτερο/Ζεστό; Ουδέτερο/Ζεστό/Ροζ; Ελιά/Κίτρινο; Ροζ/Κίτρινο; Κόκκινο/Κίτρινο; Τριαντάφυλλο; Θερμή; Ζεστό/Κίτρινο; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
tr: Cilt Alt Tonu: Kahverengi/Kırmızı/Sarı; Serin; Serin/Pembe; Gold; Nötr; Nötr/Sıcak; Nötr/Sıcak/Pembe; Zeytin/Sarı; Pembe/Sarı; Kırmızı/Sarı; Gül; Sıcak; Sıcak/Sarı; Sarı; Diğer
pt-BR: Subtom de pele: Marrom/Vermelha/Amarela; Fria; Fria/Rosa; Gold; Neutra; Neutra/Quente; Neutra/Quente/Rosa; Oliva/Amarela; Rosa/Amarela; Vermelha/Amarela; Rosa; Quente; Quente/Amarela; Amarela; Outro
it: Sottotono della pelle: Marrone/Rosso/Giallo; Freddo; Freddo/rosato; Oro; Neutro; Neutro/Caldo; Neutro/Caldo/Rosato; Olivastro/Giallo; Rosato/Giallo; Rosso/Giallo; Rosa; Caldo; Caldo/Giallo; Giallo; Altro
ru: Подтон кожи: Коричневый/красный/желтый; Холодный; Холодный/розовый; Золотой; Нейтральный; Нейтральный/теплый; Нейтральный/теплый/розовый; Оливковый/желтый; Розовый/желтый; Красный/желтый; Розовый; Теплый; Теплый/желтый; Желтый; Другой
pt-PT: Subtom de pele: Castanho/Vermelho/Amarelo; Frio; Frio/Rosa; Ouro; Neutro; Neutro/Quente; Neutro/Quente/Rosa; Azeitona/Amarelo; Rosa/Amarelo; Vermelho/Amarelo; Rosa; Quente; Quente/Amarelo; Amarelo; Outro
da: Hudundertone: Brun/rød/gul; Cool; Cool/pink; Guld; Neutral; Neutral/varm; Neutral/varm/pink; Oliven/gul; Pink/gul; Rød/gul; Rose; Varm; Varm/gul; Gul; Andet